Nebraska, session 109, LB588.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB588 LB588
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-512, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-512 (1) Any dependent child as defined in section 43-504 or any
relative or eligible caretaker of such a dependent child may file with
the Department of Health and Human Services a written application for
financial assistance for such child on forms furnished by the department.
(2) The department, through its agents and employees, shall make
such investigation pursuant to the application as it deems necessary or
as may be required by the county attorney or authorized attorney. If the
investigation or the application for financial assistance discloses that
such child has a parent or stepparent who is able to contribute to the
support of such child and has failed to do so, a copy of the finding of
such investigation and a copy of the application shall immediately be
filed with the county attorney or authorized attorney.
(3) The department shall make a finding as to whether the
application referred to in subsection (1) of this section should be
allowed or denied. If the department finds that the application should be
allowed, the department shall further find the amount of monthly
assistance which should be paid with reference to such dependent child.
Except as may be otherwise provided, payments shall be made by unit size
and shall be consistent with subdivisions (1)(p), (1)(q), (1)(t), (1)(u),
and (1)(v) of section 68-1713. Beginning on September 10, 2025 August 30,
2015, the maximum payment level for monthly assistance shall be
calculated and tied to the annual inflation factor fifty-five percent of
the standard of need described in section 43-513.
No payments shall be made for amounts totaling less than ten dollars
per month except in the recovery of overpayments.
(4) The amount which shall be paid as assistance with respect to a
dependent child shall be based in each case upon the conditions disclosed
by the investigation made by the department. An appeal shall lie from the
finding made in each case to the chief executive officer of the
-2-

LB588 LB588
2025 2025
department or his or her designated representative. Such appeal may be
taken by any taxpayer or by any relative of such child. Proceedings for
and upon appeal shall be conducted in the same manner as provided for in
section 68-1016.
(5)(a) For the purpose of preventing dependency, the department
shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations providing for services
to former and potential recipients of aid to dependent children and
medical assistance benefits. The department shall adopt and promulgate
rules and regulations establishing programs and cooperating with programs
of work incentive, work experience, job training, and education. The
provisions of this section with regard to determination of need, amount
of payment, maximum payment, and method of payment shall not be
applicable to families or children included in such programs. Income and
assets described in section 68-1201 shall not be included in
determination of need under this section.
(b) If a recipient of aid to dependent children becomes ineligible
for aid to dependent children as a result of increased hours of
employment or increased income from employment after having participated
in any of the programs established pursuant to subdivision (a) of this
subsection, the recipient may be eligible for the following benefits, as
provided in rules and regulations of the department in accordance with
sections 402, 417, and 1925 of the federal Social Security Act, as
amended, Public Law 100-485, in order to help the family during the
transition from public assistance to independence:
(i) An ongoing transitional payment that is intended to meet the
family's ongoing basic needs which may include food, clothing, shelter,
utilities, household goods, personal care items, and general incidental
expenses during the five months following the time the family becomes
ineligible for assistance under the aid to dependent children program, if
the family's earned income is at or below one hundred eighty-five percent
of the federal poverty level at the time the family becomes ineligible
-3-

LB588 LB588
2025 2025
for the aid to dependent children program. Payments shall be made in five
monthly payments, each equal to one-fifth of the aid to dependent
children payment standard for the family's size at the time the family
becomes ineligible for the aid to dependent children program. If during
the five-month period, (A) the family's earnings exceed one hundred
eighty-five percent of the federal poverty level, (B) the family members
are no longer working, (C) the family ceases to be Nebraska residents,
(D) there is no longer a minor child in the family's household, or (E)
the family again becomes eligible for the aid to dependent children
program, the family shall become ineligible for any remaining
transitional benefits under this subdivision;
(ii) Child care as provided in subdivision (1)(c) of section
68-1724; and
(iii) Except as may be provided in accordance with subsection (2) of
section 68-1713 and subdivision (1)(c) of section 68-1724, medical
assistance for up to twelve months after the month the recipient becomes
employed and is no longer eligible for aid to dependent children.
(6) For purposes of sections 43-512 to 43-512.18:
(a) Authorized attorney shall mean an attorney, employed by the
county subject to the approval of the county board, employed by the
department, or appointed by the court, who is authorized to investigate
and prosecute child, spousal, and medical support cases. An authorized
attorney shall represent the state as provided in section 43-512.03;
(b) Child support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1705;
(c) Medical support shall include all expenses associated with the
birth of a child, cash medical support as defined in section 42-369,
health care coverage as defined in section 44-3,144, and medical and
hospital insurance coverage or membership in a health maintenance
organization or preferred provider organization;
(d) Spousal support shall be defined as provided in section 43-1715;
(e) State Disbursement Unit shall be defined as provided in section
-4-

LB588 LB588
2025 2025
43-3341; and
(f) Support shall be defined as provided in section 43-3313.
Sec. 2. Original section 43-512, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-5-